Vermont statutes. Title 20 Internal Security and Public Safety
Chapter 31. Oaths and Duties of Officers and Enlisted Members

§ 701.
Oaths of officers.

A person commissioned as an officer or warrant officer of the National Guard, within the time designated by the Governor after the commission is tendered to the officer, shall take and subscribe to the oath as required by federal law and regulations before a civil officer legally qualified to administer oaths, or before a National Guard officer or warrant officer who has previously taken and subscribed the oath.

The oath shall contain obligations of allegiance to the State and to the United States, or, in the absence of federal law or regulations upon the subject, the oath shall be prescribed by the Governor.

In case of neglect or refusal to take the oath within the time specified, the officer shall be deemed to have resigned his or her office and a new election shall be ordered or appointment made as required by law.

HISTORY:

Amended

2017, No. 113

(Adj. Sess.), § 121;

2021, No. 10

, § 38.

§ 702.
Oaths of enlisted members.

At the time of their enlistment, all enlisted members of the National Guard shall take and subscribe to the oath and contract prescribed by federal law and regulations before a National Guard officer or warrant officer who has taken and subscribed to the oath for officers pursuant to section 701 of this chapter.

The oath shall contain obligations of allegiance to the State and to the United States. In the absence of applicable federal law or regulations, the oath and contract shall be prescribed by the Governor.

HISTORY:

Amended

2017, No. 113

(Adj. Sess.), § 122;

2021, No. 10

, § 39.

§ 703.
Duties of officers.

Commissioned officers shall obey orders received from superior officers; attend drills, parades, inspections, and reviews prescribed or authorized by this chapter; make returns pursuant to the direction of the Governor or rules adopted by the Adjutant and Inspector General; perform other duties incident to their positions under the Constitution and laws of this State and of the United States; and conform to rules adopted by the Adjutant and Inspector General.

HISTORY:

Amended

2017, No. 113

(Adj. Sess.), § 123;

2021, No. 10

, § 40.

§ 704.
Duties of enlisted members.

Enlisted members shall obey orders received from their officers to attend drills, parades, inspections, and reviews directed or authorized by this chapter, and perform the duties incident to their respective positions, subject to the rules adopted by the Adjutant and Inspector General.

HISTORY:

Amended

2017, No. 113

(Adj. Sess.), § 124;

2021, No. 10

, § 41.

§§ 705,
706.
Repealed.
1973, No. 223 (Adj. Sess.), § 17, eff. April 4, 1974.